Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7890.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-1 of the General Laws entitled "Public Utilities Commission" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-1-64. Intervenor compensation program.
(a) Terms used in this section shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is
expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:
(1) "Compensation" means payment for all or part, of legal fees, expert witness fees, and
other reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a proceeding and includes the fees and
costs of obtaining an award under this section and of obtaining judicial review, if any.
(2) "Expert witness fees" means recorded or billed costs incurred by an intervenor for an
expert witness.
(3) "Intervenor compensation special fund" means the intervenor compensation special
fund established in this section.
(4) "Other reasonable costs" means reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, directly incurred
by an intervenor, that are directly related to the contentions or recommendations made by the
customer.
(5) "Significant financial hardship" means that the intervenor cannot afford, without undue
hardship, to pay the costs of effective participation, including legal fees, expert witness fees, and
other reasonable costs of participation.

(b) There is established an intervenor compensation program to provide compensation in
the form of a grant for legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs to an intervenor
in commission proceedings.
(c) There is created an account to be known as the “intervenor compensation special fund”
within the public utilities commission in the general fund, hereinafter referred to as the “account,”
for the purpose of providing funding to qualified intervenors who have a significant financial
hardship consistent with the provisions of this section.
(d) Grants shall be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), with the amount being
adjusted every five (5) years consistent with the consumer price index. The grant may be used to
cover legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable expenses. Ten percent (10%) of the
approved grant may go to non-legal or non-expert witness fees. Any grant awarded pursuant to this
section shall be used only in proceedings before the commission and shall be ineligible for use for
any judicial appeal of any board final decision.
(e) The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the account the amounts that may
be required to bring the balance of the account to the sum of three hundred thousand dollars
($300,000), with the sum being adjusted every five (5) years consistent with the consumer price
index; provided, however, that if at June 30 in any year the balance in the account shall be in excess
of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000), the amount in excess shall be transferred to the
general fund of the state. The controller is authorized and directed to draw their orders upon the
general treasurer for the payment from the account of the sums as may be required from time to
time upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers approved by the chairperson
of the commission. The commission may appropriate up to ten percent (10%) of the account balance
to hire a consultant to assist with the administration of the program.
(f) The provisions of this section shall only apply to proceedings involving electric
distribution companies serving over one hundred thousand (100,000) customers, electric
transmission companies, gas distribution companies, and energy efficiency programs.
(g) In furtherance of the purposes of this section, the commission shall:
(1) If funds are appropriated by the general assembly, develop accessible, multi-lingual
and easily comprehensible web-based educational materials, including forms and templates, to
educate prospective grantees and the public on the intervenor support grant program.
(2) If funds are appropriated by the general assembly, provide a virtual and in-person
outreach program to educate prospective grantees and the public about the intervenor compensation
grant program.
(3) Award a grant to offset legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of
LC005168 - Page 2 of 8

preparation for and participation in a hearing or proceeding to any party who satisfies the following
requirements:
(i) The party satisfies the standard for intervention in the proceeding;
(ii) The party is:
(A) An individual person or an individual person on behalf of an unorganized group of
individual persons; or
(B) An organization organized under the provisions of Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)3.
(iii) Intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes a significant financial hardship.
(4) Submit an annual report to the governor and general assembly that accounts for all
revenues and expenses of the program.
(5) If the commission finds that an intervenor qualifies for grant funding and the account
contains insufficient funds, the commission may order a utility serving more than one hundred
thousand (100,000) customers involved in the proceeding to pay up to one hundred thousand dollars
($100,000) into the account to meet the commission’s grant obligations. Any such ordered payment
may be recovered in rates.
(h) Grants issued to intervenors shall be awarded in a manner consistent with the following
requirements:
(1) Intervenors shall provide notice in their intervention request to the commission that
they are seeking funding from the intervenor compensation special fund and provide any such
documentation as may be required by the commission to qualify for receiving a grant.
(2) The commission shall review the notice and additional documentation for completeness
and shall notify the applicant within ten (10) days of any deficiencies.
(3) The request for funding shall not be a contestable issue by other non-governmental
parties.
(4) Requests for funding shall be approved or denied within thirty (30) days from a
complete application being provided to the commission.
(5) The commission shall issue a written determination of approval.
(6) Grants awarded from the fund shall be paid out from the account no later than thirty
(30) days after approval.
(7) For any proceeding that includes a statutory requirement for a commission action in a
specific period of time, the commission may, at its discretion or upon motion of a party, provide an
alternative timeline to meet the purposes of this section.
(i) Grantees shall abide by the following requirements as conditions for receipt of funds:
(1) Grantees shall not withdraw from the proceeding.
LC005168 - Page 3 of 8

(2) Grantees shall provide a report, no later than thirty (30) days from issuance of a written
order, that details the expenditure of grant funds.
(3) Grantees shall use funds solely for proceedings before the commission, meaning funds
may not be used for any appeal of final commission decisions.
(4) Grantees shall use funds solely for the purposes set out in its application to the
commission.
(j) A breach of the conditions described in subsection (i) of this section may be enforced
by a commission’s order to repay the funds awarded following notice and opportunity to contest
the order by the grantee. Any entity subject to an order issued pursuant to subsection (j) of this
section shall not be considered for future funding from the intervenor compensation fund until the
commission order is satisfied.
(k) If upon completion of the proceeding and submittal of the grantee’s report to the
commission, the grantee’s grant award exceeds the actual spending, such excess funds shall be
returned to the intervenor special compensation fund.
SECTION 2. Section 42-98-17 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-98 entitled "Energy
Facility Siting Act" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-98-17. Appropriation — Fees — Grants.
(a) There is created an account to be known as the “energy facility siting account”, an
account within the public utilities commission in the general fund, hereinafter referred to as the
“account”, for the purpose of providing the financial means for the board to purchase materials and
to employ on a contract or other basis legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants,
administration of the intervenor compensation fund, and expert witnesses and for other necessary
expenses of the board in investigations and hearings on applications for licensure under this chapter.
The general assembly shall annually appropriate to the account the amounts as may be required to
bring the balance of the account to the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) three
hundred thousand dollars ($300,000); provided, however, that if at June 30 in any year the balance
in the account shall be in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) three hundred
thousand dollars ($300,000), the amount of the excess shall be transferred to the general account
of the state. The controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment from the account of the sums as may be required from time to time upon
receipt by the controller of proper vouchers approved by the chairperson of the board or the
secretary.
(b) The board shall be authorized to establish reasonable fees for investigations,
applications, and hearings. The board shall be authorized to add on a reasonable charge on top of
LC005168 - Page 4 of 8

existing fees for applicants to provide adequate funding to the intervenor compensation program as
described in subsection (a) of this section. Applicants shall pay those fees in full prior to the hearing
process commencing unless the board agrees to an alternative payment schedule. All fees collected
by the board shall be deposited with the general treasurer and appropriated to the board. The state
controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payment
of any sum or sums as may be necessary from time to time and upon receipt by him or her of
authenticated vouchers presented by the coordinator of the board.
(c) All moneys collected by the chairperson or the secretary pursuant to this section shall
be paid by the chairperson or the secretary monthly to the general treasurer to be added to the
energy facility siting account.
(d) Failure of the applicant to pay expenses lawfully assessed by the board shall constitute
grounds for suspension of licensing proceedings or revocation of any license granted, until the
applicant has paid the expenses.
(e) The board shall be empowered to draw upon this account and to distribute monies from
the fees to and bodies of state and local government participating in licensing actions or acting as
the board’s agents for the purposes of insuring compliance with license provisions and for
employing staff or consultants and for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.
(f) The board shall be authorized to receive any grants made for the purpose of planning
for or regulating the siting of energy facilities and to disburse and administer the grants under the
terms of the grants.
SECTION 3. Chapter 42-98 of the General Laws entitled "Energy Facility Siting Act" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
42-98-17.1. Intervenor compensation program.
(a) Terms used in this section shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is
expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:
(1) "Compensation" means payment for all or part, of reasonable advocate’s fees,
reasonable expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of preparation for and participation in a
proceeding, and includes the fees and costs of obtaining an award under this section and of
obtaining judicial review, if any.
(2) "Expert witness fees" means recorded or billed costs incurred by an intervenor for an
expert witness.
(3) "Intervenor compensation special fund" means the intervenor compensation special
fund established in this section.
(4) “Other reasonable costs" means reasonable out-of-pocket expenses, directly incurred
LC005168 - Page 5 of 8

by an intervenor, that are directly related to the contentions or recommendations made by the
customer.
(5) “Significant financial hardship" means that the customer cannot afford, without undue
hardship, to pay the costs of effective participation, including advocate’s fees, expert witness fees,
and other reasonable costs of participation.
(b) There is established an intervenor compensation program to provide compensation in
the form of a grant for legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs to an intervenor
in board proceedings.
(c) Funding for the program shall be as provided in subsection (d) of this section.
(d) Grants shall be in the amount of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), with the amount being
adjusted every five (5) years consistent with the consumer price index. The grant may be used to
cover legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable expenses. Ten percent (10%) of the
approved grant may go to non-legal or non-expert witness fees. Any grant awarded pursuant to this
section shall be used only in proceedings before the board and shall be ineligible for use for any
judicial appeal of any board final decision.
(e) In furtherance of the purposes of this section, the board shall:
(1) If funds are appropriated by the general assembly, develop accessible, multi-lingual
and easily comprehensible web-based educational materials, including forms and templates, to
educate prospective grantees and the public on the intervenor support grant program.
(2) If funds are appropriated by the general assembly, provide a virtual and in-person
outreach program to educate prospective grantees and the public about the intervenor compensation
grant program.
(3) Award a grant to offset legal fees, expert witness fees, and other reasonable costs of
preparation for and participation in a hearing or proceeding to any party who satisfies of the
following requirements:
(i) The party satisfies the standard for intervention in the proceeding;
(ii) The party is:
(A) An individual or an individual on behalf of an unorganized group of individuals; or
(B) An organization organized under the provisions of Internal Revenue Code § 501(c)3.
(iii) Intervention without an award of fees or costs imposes a significant financial hardship.
(4) Submit an annual report to the governor and general assembly that accounts for all
revenues and expenses of the program.
(f) Grants issued to intervenors shall be awarded in a manner consistent with the following
requirements:
LC005168 - Page 6 of 8

(1) Intervenors shall provide notice in its intervention request to the board that it is seeking
funding from the intervenor compensation special fund and provide any such documentation as
may be required by the board to qualify for receiving a grant.
(2) The commission shall review such notice and additional documentation for
completeness and shall notify the applicant within ten (10) days of any deficiencies.
(3) The request for funding shall not be a contestable issue by non-governmental parties.
(4) Requests for funding shall be approved or denied within thirty (30) days from a
complete application being provided to the board.
(5) The board shall issue a written determination of approval.
(6) Grants awarded under this section shall be paid out from the account no later than thirty
(30) days after approval
(g) Grantees shall abide by the following requirements as conditions for receipt of funds:
(1) Grantees shall not withdraw from the proceeding.
(2) Grantees shall provide a report, no later than thirty (30) days from issuance of a written
order, that details the expenditure of grant funds.
(3) Grantees shall use funds solely for proceedings before the commission, meaning funds
may not be used for any appeal of final commission decisions.
(h) A breach of the conditions described in subsection (i) of this section may be enforced
by board order to repay the funds awarded following notice and opportunity to contest the order by
the grantee. Any entity subject to an order issued pursuant to subsection (j) of this section shall not
be considered for future funding from the intervenor compensation fund until the commission order
is satisfied.
(i) If upon completion of the proceeding and submittal of the grantee’s report to the
commission, the grantee’s grant award exceeds the actual spending, such excess funds shall be
returned to the intervenor special compensation fund.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005168
========
LC005168 - Page 7 of 8